Maryland, session 2025, HB0502.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Human Services
7–114.
(b) The Department shall oversee and administer the following programs and
units:
(1) constituent services and ombudsmen programs;
(2) the Assistive Technology Guaranteed Loan Program under Subtitle 6
of this title;
(3) the Office of Personal Assistance Services, including the Attendant
Care Program under Subtitle 4 of this title;
(4) Telecommunications Access of Maryland under Subtitle 8 of this title;
[and]
(5) Telecommunications Devices and Distribution of Accessible
Information for Disabled Individuals under Subtitle 9 of this title; AND
(6) THE OFFICE OF DISABILITY EMPLOYMENT ADVANCEMENT AND
POLICY.
SUBTITLE 12. OFFICE OF DISABILITY EMPLOYMENT ADVANCEMENT AND POLICY.
7–1201.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.

HOUSE BILL 502 3
(B) “DEPARTMENT” MEANS THE DEPARTMENT OF DISABILITIES.
(C) “INITIATIVE” MEANS THE MARYLAND AS A MODEL EMPLOYER
INITIATIVE.
(D) “OFFICE” MEANS THE OFFICE OF DISABILITY EMPLOYMENT
ADVANCEMENT AND POLICY.
(E) “SECRETARY” MEANS THE SECRETARY OF DISABILITIES.
7–1202.
(A) THERE IS AN OFFICE OF DISABILITY EMPLOYMENT ADVANCEMENT
AND POLICY WITHIN THE DEPARTMENT.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE OFFICE INCLUDES:
(1) THE DEVELOPMENT AND IMPLEMENTATION OF STRATEGIES IN
THE STATE DISABILITIES PLAN, ESTABLISHED UNDER § 7–132 OF THIS TITLE,
RELATING TO THE EMPLOYMENT, TRAINING, AND CAREER–READINESS OF
INDIVIDUALS WITH DISABILITIES;
(2) PERFORMING DUTIES UNDER § 7–114 OF THIS TITLE NECESSARY
TO SUPPORT STATEWIDE POLICIES AND STANDARDS RELATING TO THE
EMPLOYMENT, TRAINING, AND CAREER–READINESS OF INDIVIDUALS WITH
DISABILITIES;
(3) COLLECTING INFORMATION AND DATA FROM UNITS OF STATE
GOVERNMENT RELATING TO THE EMPLOYMENT, TRAINING, AND
CAREER–READINESS OF INDIVIDUALS WITH DISABILITIES, IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
7–115 OF THIS TITLE; AND
(4) IMPLEMENTING THE MARYLAND AS A MODEL EMPLOYER
INITIATIVE, ESTABLISHED UNDER § 7–1205 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(C) BEGINNING IN FISCAL YEAR 2027, THE GOVERNOR MAY INCLUDE IN THE
ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION OF $250,000 FOR THE OFFICE.
7–1203.
THE SECRETARY MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS AS NECESSARY TO CARRY OUT
THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SUBTITLE.

HOUSE BILL 502
7–1204.
THIS SUBTITLE MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO ESTABLISH AN ENTITLEMENT
PROGRAM.
7–1205.
(A) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2026, THE OFFICE SHALL BE RESPONSIBLE FOR
IMPLEMENTATION AND OVERSIGHT OF THE MARYLAND AS A MODEL EMPLOYER
INITIATIVE.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE INITIATIVE SHALL INCLUDE:
(1) PROMOTING THE RECRUITMENT, HIRING, RETENTION, AND
CAREER ADVANCEMENT OF PEOPLE WITH DISABILITIES ACROSS STATE
GOVERNMENT;
(2) CONDUCTING AND COORDINATING OUTREACH TO JOB SEEKERS
WITH DISABILITIES AND STATE GOVERNMENT TO ENCOURAGE PARTICIPATION IN
THE INITIATIVE;
(3) DEVELOPING AND DELIVERING TRAININGS TO STATE AGENCIES
AND UNITS ADDRESSING BEST PRACTICES, RESOURCES, AND RELEVANT FEDERAL
AND STATE LAWS PERTAINING TO THE EMPLOYMENT OF PEOPLE WITH
DISABILITIES;
(4) ASSISTING STATE GOVERNMENT AGENCIES AND UNITS TO
ATTRACT QUALIFIED JOB SEEKERS WITH DISABILITIES TO AVAILABLE POSITIONS;
(5) PROMOTING ACCESS TO AND ACQUISITION OF ASSISTIVE
TECHNOLOGY FOR NEW STATE EMPLOYEES WITH DISABILITIES;
(6) EVALUATING STATE EMPLOYMENT PRACTICES AND POLICIES AND
MAKING RECOMMENDATIONS REGARDING WAYS TO REDUCE BARRIERS FOR JOB
SEEKERS AND EMPLOYEES WITH DISABILITIES;
(7) COLLECTING FROM EACH UNIT OF STATE GOVERNMENT, AS PART
OF THE PLANS REQUIRED UNDER § 7–116 OF THIS TITLE, PERFORMANCE GOALS
RELATED TO HIRING AND RETENTION EFFORTS FOR EMPLOYEES WITH DISABILITIES
AND ANY DATA DEEMED NECESSARY BY THE SECRETARY TO DEMONSTRATE
PERFORMANCE OUTCOMES; AND
(8) REPORTING ON THE INITIATIVE’S OUTCOMES IN COMPLIANCE
WITH SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION.

HOUSE BILL 502 5
(C) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2026, AND EACH DECEMBER 1
THEREAFTER, THE OFFICE SHALL REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR AND THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE,
ON:
(1) PROGRESS AND OUTCOMES OF THE INITIATIVE; AND
(2) RECOMMENDATIONS DEVELOPED BY THE INITIATIVE FOR
CONTINUED IMPROVEMENT OF STATE GOVERNMENT EMPLOYMENT PRACTICES FOR
PEOPLE WITH DISABILITIES.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.